Massachusetts, session 194th, S499.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “If the final day for registration
of voters falls on” the following:- Saturday,
SECTION 2. Section 25B of chapter 54, as amended by chapter 92 of the acts of 2022, is
hereby further amended by striking the word “seventeenth” and replacing it with the following:-
tenth;
And further by striking the words “presidential or state primary or primary or”;
And further in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by striking the terms “a primary or” and
replacing it with the following:- an
of 1